District of Columbia statutes.
32-1368

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply as of October 1, 2015.

History

May 31, 2012, D.C. Law 19-132, § 9, 59 DCR 2391
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7007, 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “as of October 1, 2015” for “upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b)( 1) of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-544, Dec. 29, 2014, 62 DCR 243, 20 STAT 4458).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-132, § 9, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).